Vermont, session 2025-2026, S234.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 304d is added to read:
§ 304d. MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION PLATES; VERMONT
GREEN FC
(a) The Commissioner shall, upon application, issue “Vermont Green FC”
registration plates for use only on vehicles registered at the pleasure car rate,
on trucks registered for less than 26,001 pounds, on vehicles registered to State
agencies under section 376 of this title, and excluding vehicles registered under
VT LEG #385945 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.234
2026 Page 2 of 4
the International Registration Plan. Plates so acquired shall be mounted on the
front and rear of the vehicle. The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall
utilize the graphic design recommended by the Office of the Treasurer for the
special plates to enhance the public awareness of the State’s interest in
supporting environmental justice and the outdoor recreation economy.
Applicants shall apply on forms prescribed by the Commissioner of Motor
Vehicles and shall pay an initial fee of $45.00 in addition to the annual fee for
registration. In following years, in addition to the annual registration fee, the
holder of a plate shall pay a renewal fee of $45.00. The Commissioner of
Motor Vehicles shall adopt rules under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to implement the
provisions of this subsection.
(b) Initial registration fees collected under subsection (a) of this section
shall be deposited as follows:
(1) 23 percent in the Transportation Fund; and
(2) 77 percent in the Vermont Green FC Special Fund created pursuant
to 32 V.S.A. § 112.
(c) Renewal fees collected under subsection (a) of this section shall be
deposited as follows:
(1) 16 percent in the Transportation Fund; and
(2) 84 percent in the Vermont Green FC Special Fund created in 32
V.S.A. § 112.
VT LEG #385945 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.234
2026 Page 3 of 4
(d) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall be charged by the Department
of Corrections for the production of the Vermont Green FC registration plates.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 112 is added to read:
§ 112. VERMONT GREEN FC SPECIAL FUND
(a) There is established the Vermont Green FC Special Fund, which shall
be managed in accordance with chapter 7, subchapter 5 of this title. The
purpose of the Fund is to provide support for environmental justice and the
outdoor recreation economy.
(b) The Fund shall consist of:
(1) receipts from the sale of Vermont Green FC motor vehicle
registration plates pursuant to 23 V.S.A. § 304d;
(2) any gifts, grants, or contributions made to the Fund; and
(3) any amounts appropriated by the General Assembly.
(c)(1) All interest earned on Fund balances shall be credited to the Fund.
(2) The Treasurer and the board created pursuant to subsection (d) of
this section may seek and accept gifts, donations, and grants from any source,
public or private, to be dedicated for deposit into the Fund.
(3) Monies in the Fund shall be used solely to provide support for
environmental justice and the outdoor recreation economy and for any
administrative costs incurred in administering the Fund.
VT LEG #385945 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.234
2026 Page 4 of 4
(d)(1) The Fund shall be overseen by a board composed of:
(A) the Treasurer or designee;
(B) the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles or designee;
(C) the Director of the Climate Action Office or designee;
(D) a representative of the Vermont Green Football Club; and
(E) the Executive Director of the Vermont Outdoor Business
Alliance or designee.
(2) The board shall oversee the Fund and may make expenditures from
the Fund in the form of grants to local and regional governments or
governmental agencies, or nonprofit or citizen groups for the following
reasons:
(A) to advance environmental justice; and
(B) to support the growth of Vermont’s outdoor recreation economy.
(3) The board shall have the administrative and legal support of the
Office of the Treasurer.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385945 v.1